Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-226
Use of electronic research capabilities; authorized; payment.

The Supreme Court may authorize, for judges of the district court and judges of the county court, the use of electronic research capabilities available on the state computer network. All costs and expenses related to such use shall be paid by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 1.